Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-321
Telecommunications Act of 1996, defined.

Telecommunications Act of 1996 means the federal telecommunications legislation enacted as Public Law 104-104, as such law existed on January 1, 2002.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 199.